Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 12 Management

7-1-480.
Board of directors.

Administration of the business and affairs of a bank or trust company shall be the responsibility of a board of directors.

Seventy-five percent of the directors shall be citizens of the United States and at least a majority shall:

Reside in Georgia; or

Reside within 40 miles of any banking location authorized to offer a complete banking or trust service.

The residency requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall not apply to banks having branches in states other than Georgia, provided that the residency of directors is consistent with the bank’s articles of incorporation and bylaws.

The department may waive or modify the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section relating to the residency requirements in the State of Georgia.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this Code section, directors who were legally qualified to serve on April 1, 1975, may continue to serve for such time as they are continuously members of the board of directors of their bank or trust company.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 2818; Ga. L. 1917, p. 62, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 8; Code 1933, §§ 13-2001, 13-2002, 109-103; Ga. L. 1943, p. 249, § 3; Ga. L. 1947, p. 476, § 1; Ga. L. 1947, p. 480, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 378, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 323, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 196, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 6; Ga. L. 1973, p. 811, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-2201, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 458, § 6; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 15; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 9; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 4; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 3/HB 781.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “that” in subsection (c) and substituted “relating to the residency requirements in the State of Georgia” for “with respect to special purpose banks organized pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 7-1-394” in subsection (d).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “bank’s” was substituted for “banks” in subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For article discussing limitations on the establishment and transaction of international banking in Georgia, see 27 Mercer L. Rev. 629 (1976).

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

7-1-481.
Adopting, amending, and repealing bylaws.

The board of directors shall have the power to adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws as specified in paragraph (4) of Code Section 7-1-260 unless such power is reserved exclusively to the shareholders by the articles or in bylaws previously adopted by the shareholders; but any bylaws adopted by the board of directors may be altered, amended, or repealed and new bylaws adopted by the shareholders. The shareholders may prescribe that any bylaw or bylaws adopted by them shall not be altered, amended, or repealed by the board of directors. Copies of the bylaws and any change, addition, or amendment thereto shall be filed with the department immediately upon adoption by the directors or the shareholders.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 5; Civil Code 1910, § 2819; Code 1933, § 109-104; Code 1933, § 41A-2202, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-482.
Number, term, and compensation of directors; effect of failure to maintain at least five directors.

The articles or bylaws of any bank or trust company may fix the number of directors of its policy-making board at not less than five nor more than 25 and may provide that the board may, within such limitation, increase or decrease the number of directors by not more than two in any one year, provided that nothing in this subsection shall require a bank with a board of directors of less than five on July 1, 1972, to increase its board to five members. The failure of a bank or trust company to maintain at least five directors at any time does not exculpate the remaining directors from their obligations and liabilities associated with the actions and decisions made as directors of the financial institution, nor does it in any way void any actions taken or decisions made by the board of directors during any such time that there were less than five directors.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each director shall be elected by the shareholders for a term of one year or for staggered terms as provided in Code Section 14-2-806 and shall serve until he or she resigns, is removed, or becomes disqualified or until his or her successor shall have been duly elected and qualified.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, the board of directors may fix the compensation for directors; and a director may be a salaried officer of the bank or trust company.

Notwithstanding the requirements of this Code section, the board of directors of a bank may appoint one or more nonpolicy-making regional boards of directors to consist of a number of persons to be determined by the board. The members of such regional boards may not set bank policy but may exercise certain powers, duties, and responsibilities as delegated by the board. Such regional board members shall have the same status as nonpolicy-making officers of the bank. All such delegations shall be documented in detail in the minutes of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 2818; Ga. L. 1917, p. 62, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-2001, 109-103; Ga. L. 1947, p. 476, § 1; Ga. L. 1947, p. 480, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 6; Code 1933, § 41A-2203, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 10; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 3/HB 239.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, a comma was deleted following “Code Section 14-2-806” in subsection (b).

7-1-483.
Meetings of board; quorum; committees; acting without meeting.

The board of directors shall hold regular meetings at such times as may be fixed by the bylaws and shall at all times be subject to call by the chairman of the board, by the president, or by any two members of the board. The board shall meet at least once in ten different months of each calendar year unless an alternative schedule is approved in writing by the department, but in no event shall the board meet less frequently than once in each calendar quarter.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws:

A majority of all the directors in office shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and actions of a majority of those present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be actions of the board;

The board of directors may designate three or more of its number to constitute an executive committee or other committees which, to the extent provided in such resolution, shall have and exercise the authority of the board of directors in regard to the business of the bank or trust company;

Any action which may be taken at a meeting of the directors or of the members of an executive or other committee may be taken without a meeting if a consent or consents in writing setting forth the action shall be signed by all of the directors or all of the members of the executive or other committee and filed with the secretary of the bank or trust company; and

The board of directors may determine that a meeting of such board will be held, in whole or in part, by any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means shall be considered to be present in person at the meeting.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 2818; Ga. L. 1917, p. 62, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 4; Code 1933, §§ 13-2004, 109-103; Ga. L. 1947, p. 476, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-2204, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 28; Ga. L. 1988, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 6/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (b), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (b)(2), substituted “; and” for a period at the end of paragraph (b)(3), and added paragraph (b)(4).

7-1-484.
Oath of directors; liability of persons who have not subscribed to such oath.

Each director, before assuming office, shall take an oath or affirmation that he will diligently and honestly perform his duties in the administration of the affairs of the bank or trust company, that he will not permit a willful violation of law by the bank or trust company, and that he meets the eligibility requirements of this chapter and of the articles and bylaws.

A copy of the oath shall be signed by each director and shall be placed into the minutes of the meetings of the directors. No director shall be authorized to participate in the affairs of the board or receive any compensation for service as a director until the oath has been executed by such director. Any person seeking to act in the capacity of a director before subscribing to the oath and otherwise qualifying for service pursuant to the bylaws of the bank or the laws and regulations governing the operations of the bank shall be fully liable for his actions to the same extent as if that person had qualified to serve as a bank director.

The oath shall not modify in any manner the legal duties of or the standard of care for directors in the exercise of such duties.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 3; Code 1933, § 13-2003; Code 1933, § 41A-2205, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 12; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 7; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 8/HB 780.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, added subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-485.
Removal of directors; vacancies.

The entire board of directors or an individual director may be removed without cause by the vote of shareholders entitled to cast at least a majority of the votes which all shareholders would be entitled to cast at an annual election of directors.

The board may remove a director from office if:

The director is adjudicated an incompetent by a court or is convicted of a felony;

The director does not, within 60 days after his or her election or such longer time as the bylaws may specify, accept the office in writing or by attendance at a meeting and fulfill other requirements for holding the office;

The director fails to attend regular meetings of the board for six successive monthly meetings or two successive quarterly meetings, if quarterly meetings have been approved by the department, without having been excused by the board;

The director was an employee or duly elected officer of the bank or trust company and was discharged or resigned at the request of the board for reasons relating to performance of duties as an employee or officer of the bank or trust company;

The director has been indicted for any crime involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or breach of trust; or

The director has failed to make payments on a loan or other extension of credit which causes a loss to a financial institution.

Vacancies in the board of directors, whether caused by removal or otherwise and including vacancies resulting from an increase in the number of directors, may be filled by the remaining members of the board, even though less than a quorum. Each director so elected shall be a director until his successor is elected by the shareholders, who shall make such election at the next annual meeting of shareholders or at any special meeting called for that purpose prior thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-2001; Ga. L. 1947, p. 480, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 6; Code 1933, § 41A-2206, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 13; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 9; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 12/HB 143.

Cross references.

Right of department to require immediate suspension from office of director, officer, or employee of financial institution who is found to be dishonest, incompetent, or otherwise unqualified, §

7-1-71

.

7-1-486.
Honorary and advisory positions.

The board of directors of any bank or trust company may appoint an individual as an honorary director or director emeritus or member of an advisory board. An individual so appointed may be compensated but may not vote at any meeting of the board of directors or be counted in determining a quorum and shall not have any responsibility or be subject to any liability imposed upon a director, or otherwise be deemed a director.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2207, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-487.
Audits and financial reports.

The board of directors shall at least once each year have made by independent certified public accountants an audit of the books and affairs of the bank or trust company, including such matters as may be required by the department and including, in the case of a trust company, accounts held in a fiduciary or other representative capacity. An audit of a bank holding company performed in accordance with this Code section may be made in lieu of individual audits of subsidiaries of the bank holding company. The department may by regulation establish minimum standards for audits and reports under this Code section.

A report of the audit made under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be signed by the accountants who make it. A signed copy of the report shall be submitted to the board for approval or rejection and kept in the files of the bank or trust company. The bank or trust company shall submit the audit to the department in accordance with department regulations.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2208, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 16.

7-1-488.
Officers, agents, and employees; employee share plans.

A bank or trust company shall have a president, a secretary, and such other officers as the directors may from time to time designate. An individual may hold more than one office, except that the individual shall not be both president and secretary.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, the board of directors shall elect the officers, fix their compensation, and fill vacancies, however occurring. An officer elected or appointed by the board may be removed by the board at any time, whenever in its judgment the best interests of the institution will be served thereby, without prejudice to any contract right of such officer. The department shall immediately be notified in writing when the individual holding the position of chief executive officer or president of the bank changes.

The officers, as between themselves and the bank or trust company, shall have such authority and perform such duties as may be provided in the bylaws adopted by the board.

A bank or trust company may also employ such agents or employees as may be required for the prompt and orderly discharge of its business.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles, a bank or trust company may adopt and carry out a plan, approved by the directors and the affirmative vote of a majority of the shares entitled to vote thereon, for the sale of shares, or for the granting of options for shares, to some or all of the officers and employees of the bank or trust company or of any affiliate of the bank or trust company or to a trustee on behalf of such employees, upon such terms and conditions and in such manner as may be provided by the bylaws or by the board. In any such plan:

Such shares may be sold or optioned upon terms (not less than the par value thereof) which are deemed advantageous to the bank or trust company by the directors other than directors who may benefit by their action or, if the number of directors who will not benefit by the action is fewer than three, by the shareholders; and

In the absence of fraud in the transaction, the judgment of the board of directors or the shareholders as to the adequacy of the consideration received for any rights or options to purchase shares under the plan shall be conclusive.

Such a plan may be adopted whether or not it qualifies for special tax treatment under the laws of the United States.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 5; Civil Code 1910, § 2819; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 9; Ga. L. 1922, p. 63, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-2009, 109-104; Code 1933, § 13-912, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1045, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 958, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-2209, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 14; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 17; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-11/HB 811.

7-1-489.
Fidelity bonds.

Any director who is authorized to handle money or negotiable assets on behalf of a bank or trust company and all officers and employees of a bank or trust company shall be bonded by a regularly incorporated surety company authorized to do business in this state, and the bank or trust company may pay the cost of such fidelity bonds. The form, amount, and surety of such fidelity bonds shall be such as are approved by the board of directors; but the department may require an additional amount or new or additional surety.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 10; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1922, p. 63, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-2010; Code 1933, § 41A-2210, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 10/HB 184.

7-1-490.
Responsibility of directors and officers; delegation of investment decisions.

Directors and officers of a bank or trust company shall discharge the duties of their respective positions in good faith and with the degree of diligence, care, and skill which an ordinarily prudent person would exercise under similar circumstances.

In performing his or her duties, a director or officer may be entitled to rely upon:

Other officers, employees, or agents of the bank or trust company whom the director or officer reasonably believed to be reliable and competent in the functions performed; and

Information, data, opinions, reports, or statements provided by other officers, employees, agents of the bank or trust company, legal counsel, public accountants, investment bankers, or other persons as to matters involving the skills, expertise, or knowledge reasonably believed to be reliable and within such person’s professional or expert competence.

There shall be a presumption that the process directors and officers followed in arriving at decisions was done in good faith and that such directors and officers have exercised ordinary care; provided, however, that this presumption may be rebutted by evidence that such process constitutes gross negligence by being a gross deviation of the standard of care of a director or officer in a like position under similar circumstances.

A bank, through its board of directors, may delegate to a correspondent bank the power to determine, within the limits set by law, the investments in which its assets, including reserve assets, may be held, provided that the bank must obtain the prior written approval of the department for such delegation.

Nothing in this Code section shall:

In any instance when fairness is at issue, such as consideration of the fairness of a transaction to the bank or trust company as evaluated under paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Code Section 14-2-861, alter the burden of proving the fact or lack of fairness otherwise applicable;

Alter the fact or lack of liability of a director or officer under the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, including Code Sections 7-1-492 and 7-1-494;

Affect any rights to which the bank or trust company or its shareholders may be entitled under another law of this state or of the United States; or

Deprive a director or officer of the applicability, effect, or protection of the business judgment rule.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2211, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 730, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 7; Ga. L. 2017, p. 693, § 1/HB 192; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 7/SB 52.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in the introductory language of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 693, § 4/HB 192, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall apply only to causes of action arising on or after July 1, 2017.”

Law reviews.

For article, “2013 Georgia Corporation and Business Organization Case Law Developments,” see 19 Ga. St. B.J. 28 (April 2014).

For annual survey on business associations, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2014).

For article, “2014 Georgia Corporation and Business Organization Case Law Developments,” see 20 Ga. St. Bar. J. 26 (April 2015).

For annual survey of business associations, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2015).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2017).

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 321 (2017).

7-1-491.
Financing involving directors or officers.

In addition to other provisions in this chapter and federal law, a bank or trust company shall not make loans or otherwise extend financing to any one of its directors or policy-making officers except on terms, rates, and conditions which are not preferential. Preferential terms, rates, and conditions shall be determined by comparison to those terms, rates, and conditions offered contemporaneously to other borrowers making substantially similar loan requests, having substantially similar credit histories, and offering substantially similar collateral. Such loans shall be made only after the application of prudent loan underwriting criteria normally applied to loan requests of a similar nature from applicants who are not directors and policy-making officers. Approval procedures for such loans should be designed to minimize any potential abuse by bank insiders.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, §§ 11, 12; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-2011, 13-2012; Ga. L. 1968, p. 329, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-2212, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1717, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 12; Ga. L. 1984, p. 949, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 18.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Loans and discounts, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-1-5.

7-1-492.
Prohibitions applicable to directors, officers, and employees.

No director, officer, or employee of a bank or trust company shall:

Receive anything of value for procuring or attempting to procure any loan from or investment by the bank or trust company;

Purchase, or directly or indirectly be interested in purchasing, from the bank or trust company for less than its face value any promissory note or other evidence of indebtedness issued by the bank or trust company;

Purchase or sell any other asset to the bank or trust company except:

Upon terms not less favorable to the bank or trust company than those offered to other persons or corporations; and

With the prior approval of the board of directors or a committee thereof authorized to act for the board, unless the transaction is made in the regular course of business.

No director shall be eligible to vote concerning any purchase or sale where he is or would be a party to the transaction.

It shall be unlawful for any bank or trust company to lend to any officer, director, or employee any funds held in trust under powers granted in this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2213, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 7.

7-1-493.
Actions against directors and officers.

An action may be brought by any of the persons named in subsection (b) of this Code section against one or more directors or officers of a bank or trust company to procure for the benefit of the bank or trust company a judgment for the following relief:

To compel the defendant to account for his or her official conduct, or to decree any other relief called for by his or her official conduct, in the following cases:

The neglect of, failure to perform, or other violation of his or her duties in the management of the bank or trust company or in the disposition of corporate assets committed to his or her charge;

The acquisition by himself or herself, transfer to others, loss, or waste of corporate assets due to any neglect of, failure to perform, or other violation of his or her duties;

The appropriation, in violation of his or her duties, of any business opportunity of the bank or trust company;

To enjoin a proposed unlawful conveyance, assignment, or transfer of corporate assets or other unlawful corporate transaction, where there is sufficient evidence that it will be made;

To set aside an unlawful conveyance, assignment, or transfer of corporate assets, where the transferee knew of its unlawfulness and is made a party to the action.

An action may be brought for the relief provided in this Code section and in Code Section 7-1-494, relating to the liability of directors in certain cases, by the bank or trust company, or by a receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, officer, director, or judgment creditor thereof, or by a shareholder in accordance with Code Sections 7-1-440 and 7-1-441, relating to derivative actions.

No action shall be brought for the relief provided in this Code section more than four years from the time the cause of action accrued.

This Code section shall not limit any liability otherwise imposed by law upon any director or officer or any third party, provided that after April 1, 1975, Code Section 14-4-65, relating to improper dividends and liability of officers, shall no longer be applicable to officers or directors of banks or trust companies.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, a bank or trust company may provide in its articles of incorporation for the elimination or limitation of the personal liability of a director to the bank or trust company or its shareholders to the same extent as a business corporation incorporated under the provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 14.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2214, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 29; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, § 8; Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 4; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 9/HB 780.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, inserted “or her” throughout subsection (a); inserted “or herself” in subparagraph (a)(1)(B); and substituted the present provisions of subsection (e) for the former provisions, which read: “Notwithstanding the foregoing, a bank or trust company may provide through an amendment to its articles of incorporation for the elimination or limitation of the personal liability of a director to the shareholders of the bank or trust company to the same extent as a business corporation incorporated under the provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 14, provided that such an amendment to the articles of incorporation must be adopted by the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the total shares outstanding.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Statutes of Limitation: Counterproductive Complexities,” see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (1985).

7-1-494.
Liability of directors in certain cases.

In addition to any other liabilities imposed by law upon directors of a bank or trust company:

Directors of a bank or trust company who vote for or assent to the declaration of any dividend or other distribution of the assets of a bank or trust company to its shareholders which is not authorized by this chapter or is contrary to any restrictions contained in the articles shall be jointly and severally liable to the bank or trust company for the amount of such dividend which is paid or the value of such assets which are distributed in excess of the amount of such dividend or distribution which could have been paid or distributed without a violation of the provisions of this chapter or the restrictions in the articles to the extent that any depositor, creditor, or shareholder of the bank or trust company has suffered damage as a result thereof; and

The directors of a bank or trust company who vote for or assent to any distribution of assets of a bank or trust company to its shareholders during the voluntary liquidation of the bank or trust company without the payment and discharge of, or making adequate provisions for, all known debts, obligations, and liabilities of the bank or trust company shall be jointly and severally liable to the bank or trust company for the value of such assets which are distributed, to the extent that such debts, obligations, and liabilities of the bank or trust company are not thereafter paid and discharged.

A director of a bank or trust company who is present at a meeting of its board of directors at which action on any corporate matter is taken shall be presumed to have assented to the action taken unless his dissent shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting or unless he shall file his written dissent to such action with the person acting as the secretary of the meeting before the adjournment thereof or shall forward such dissent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the secretary of the bank or trust company within 24 hours after the adjournment of the meeting. Such right to dissent shall not apply to a director who, being present at the meeting, failed to vote against such action.

A director shall not be liable under subsection (a) of this Code section if he relied and acted in good faith upon financial information of the bank or trust company represented to him to be correct by the president or the officer of the bank or trust company having charge of its books of account or stated in a written report by an independent or certified public accountant or firm of such accountants to reflect fairly the financial condition of such bank or trust company; nor shall he be so liable if in good faith in determining the amount available for any such dividend or distribution he considered the assets to be represented fairly on the books of the bank.

Any director against whom any claim shall be asserted under or pursuant to this Code section for the payment of a dividend or other distribution of assets of a bank or trust company and who shall be held liable thereon shall be entitled to contribution from the shareholders who, knowing such dividend or distribution to have been made in violation of this chapter, accepted or received any such dividends or assets in proportion to the amounts received by them respectively.

Any director against whom any claim shall be asserted under or pursuant to this Code section shall be entitled to contribution from the other directors who voted for or assented to the action upon which the claim is asserted.

No liability under this Code section shall be asserted more than six years from the time the cause of action accrued.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2215, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.